Utah statutes.
10-1-406.   Limitation of other telecommunications taxes or fees.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, a municipality may not levy or collect a telecommunications tax or fee on a person except for a telecommunications tax or fee imposed by the municipality:

(a)  on a telecommunications provider to recover the management costs of the municipality caused by the activities of the telecommunications provider in the right-of-way of a municipality if the telecommunications tax or fee:

(i)  is imposed in accordance with Section 72-7-102; and

(ii)  is not related to:

(A)  a municipality's loss of use of a highway as a result of the activities of the telecommunications provider in a right-of-way; or

(B)  increased deterioration of a highway as a result of the activities of the telecommunications provider in a right-of-way; or

(b)  on a person that:

(i)  is not subject to a municipal telecommunications license tax under this part; and

(ii)  locates telecommunications facilities, as defined in Section 72-7-108, in the municipality.

(2)  Subsection (1)(a) may not be interpreted as exempting a telecommunications provider from complying with any ordinance:

(a)  related to excavation, construction, or installation of a telecommunications facility; and

(b)  that addresses the safety and quality standards of the municipality for excavation, construction, or installation.

(3)  A telecommunications tax or fee imposed under Subsection (1)(b) shall be imposed:

(a)  by ordinance; and

(b)  on a competitively neutral basis.

